Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.080

Statement of what one does not know to be true.

Every unqualified statement of that which one does not know to be true is equivalent to a statement of that which he or she knows to be false.

[ 2011 c 336 s 394; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.080.]